Washington statutes.
RCW 4.105.040

Hearing.

(1) The court shall hear a motion under RCW 4.105.020 not later than sixty days after filing of the motion, unless the court orders a later hearing:

(a) To allow discovery under RCW 4.105.030(4); or

(b) For other good cause.

(2) If the court orders a later hearing under subsection (1)(a) of this section, the court shall hear the motion under RCW 4.105.020 not later than sixty days after the court order allowing the discovery, unless the court orders a later hearing under subsection (1)(b) of this section.

[ 2021 c 259 s 5.]